Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.075

Licensee—Place of business.

(1) The licensee may not maintain more than one place of business under the same license unless:

(a) The director authorizes more than one license to the same licensee upon approval of an application by the licensee in a form and manner established by the director; or

(b) The place of business is a licensed mortgage loan originator's residence and the licensed mortgage loan originator and licensed sponsoring company comply with state and federal information security requirements and all other requirements set forth in rule for mortgage loan originators working from their residences as provided in this chapter and in rule, consistent with the purposes of this section.

(2) Whenever a licensee wishes to change the place of business to a street address other than that reported in the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry, the licensee must give prior written notice to the director, pay the fee, and obtain the director's approval.

[ 2021 c 15 s 2; 2015 c 229 s 23; 2001 c 81 s 6; 1994 c 92 s 164; 1991 c 208 s 8.]